Washington statutes.
RCW 35.18.260

Organization—Ballots.

At the election for organization on the council-manager plan, the proposition on the ballots shall be: "Shall the city (or town) of . . . . . . adopt the council-manager plan of municipal government?" followed by the words:

"For organization as a council-manager city or town . . . ."

"Against organization as a council-manager city or town . . . ."

The election shall be conducted, the vote canvassed and the results declared in the same manner as provided by law in respect to other municipal elections.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.18.260. Prior: 1943 c 271 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9198-12.]